Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.060

Council as state commission for federal law purposes.

The council is designated as the state commission as provided for in Section 1202 of the education amendments of 1972 (Public Law 92-318), as now or hereafter amended; and shall perform such functions as is necessary to comply with federal directives pertaining to the provisions of such law.

[ 2012 c 229 s 109; 2004 c 275 s 5; 1985 c 370 s 20; 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 9. Formerly RCW 28B.76.110, 28B.80.200.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 132: "This 1975 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1975." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 19.]

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 132: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 18.]